Massachusetts, session 194th, H2666.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
4, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following section:
Section 4. Organization, composition. The active or organized militia shall be composed
of volunteers, and shall comprise the aides-de-camp of the commander-in-chief, the state staff,
the armed forces of the commonwealth, as defined in section 10, the National Lancers, the 54th
Massachusetts Volunteer Regiment, the Ancient and Honorable Artillery Company of
Massachusetts, and the retired list. The organized militia shall constitute the military division of
the executive branch of the Commonwealth.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following section:
Section 4C. Ancient and Honorable Artillery Company of Massachusetts. The Ancient
and Honorable Artillery Company of Massachusetts shall retain its ancient privileges as an
organized military company, as prescribed by the act of congress known as the National Defense
Act, subject, nevertheless, to all duties required by the law of militia. The Ancient and Honorable
Artillery Company shall be organized as the commander-in-chief directs and retain its name and
the right to wear distinctive uniforms as may be approved from time to time by the commander-
in-chief. It shall retain its constitution and by-laws, including its methods of selecting its officers
and conducting its internal affairs, in so far as these are consistent with the laws of the
commonwealth and the laws of the United States, and shall serve as a ceremonial honor guard
for the commander-in-chief at state functions and otherwise as directed by the commander-in-
chief.
SECTION 3. Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
132, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition.
of 2